csv2fst/yaml_output/VII_IND_d.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:

  Lemma - ALL :

     zanagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0SgProx: zanagad
     zanagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0PlProx: zanagadoon
     zanagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0SgObv: zanagadini
     zanagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0PlObv: zanagadiniwan
     zanagad+VII+Ind+Neg+Neu+0SgProx: zanagasinoon
     zanagad+VII+Ind+Neg+Neu+0PlProx: zanagasinoon
     zanagad+VII+Ind+Neg+Neu+0SgObv: zanagasinini
     zanagad+VII+Ind+Neg+Neu+0PlObv: zanagasininiwan
     zanagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+0SgProx: zanagadooban
     zanagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+0PlProx: [zanagadoobaniin,zanagadoobanen]
     zanagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+0SgObv: zanagadiniiban
     zanagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+0PlObv: [zanagadiniibaniin,zanagadiniibanen]
     zanagad+VII+Ind+Neg+Prt+0SgProx: zanagasinooban
     zanagad+VII+Ind+Neg+Prt+0PlProx: [zanagasinoobaniin,zanagasinoobanen]
     zanagad+VII+Ind+Neg+Prt+0SgObv: zanagasininiiban
     zanagad+VII+Ind+Neg+Prt+0PlObv: [zanagasininiibaniin,zanagasininiibanen]
     zanagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+0SgProx: zanagadodog
     zanagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+0PlProx: zanagadodogenan
     zanagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+0SgObv: zanagadiniwidog
     zanagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+0PlObv: zanagadiniwidogenan
     zanagad+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+0SgProx: zanagasinodog
     zanagad+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+0PlProx: zanagasinodogen
     zanagad+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+0SgObv: zanagasininiwidog
     zanagad+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+0PlObv: zanagasininiwidogenan
     zanagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+0SgProx: zanagadogoban
     zanagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+0PlProx: [zanagadogobaniin,zanagadogobanen]
     zanagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+0SgObv: zanagadinigoban
     zanagad+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+0PlObv: [zanagadinigobaniin,zanagadinigobanen]
     zanagad+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+0SgProx: zanagasinoogoban
     zanagad+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+0PlProx: [zanagasinoogobaniin,zanagasinoogobanen]
     zanagad+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+0SgObv: zanagasininigoban
     zanagad+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+0PlObv: [zanagasininigobaniin,zanagasininigobanen]
